Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.080

Purpose for which road fund can be used—Payment of bond or warrant interest and principal.

The payment of interest or principal on general obligation county road bonds, or retirement of registered warrants both as to principal and interest when such warrants have been issued for a proper county road purpose, are declared to be a proper county road purpose.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 30 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.82.080. Prior: 1943 c 82 s 5, part; 1937 c 187 s 53, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-53, part.]